Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.390

When dealer must pay for products delivered to him or her.

(1) Every dealer must pay for agricultural products, except livestock, delivered to him or her at the time and in the manner specified in the contract with the producer, but if no time is set by such contract, or at the time of said delivery, then within thirty days from the delivery or taking possession of such agricultural products.

(2) Every dealer must pay for livestock delivered to him or her at the time and in the manner specified in the contract, but if no time is set by such contract, or at the time of said delivery, then within seven days from the delivery or taking possession of such livestock. Where payment for livestock is made by mail, payment is timely if mailed within seven days of the date of sale.

[ 2011 c 336 s 587; 1982 c 20 s 2; 1959 c 139 s 39.]